Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7646.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 10 of the General Laws entitled "COURTS AND CIVIL PROCEDURE
— PROCEDURE IN PARTICULAR ACTIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the
following chapter:
CHAPTER 19.1
RHODE ISLAND MEDICAL LIABILITY ACTIONS
10-19.1-1. Definitions.
(1) “Healthcare provider” means those persons defined in § 5-37.3-3.
(2) “Tribunal” means the panel established by § 10-19.1-2.
10-19.1-2. Medical malpractice tribunal.
(a) Every action for malpractice, error, or mistake against a healthcare provider shall be
heard by a tribunal consisting of a justice of the superior court, who shall preside; an attorney
licensed to practice law in this state; and a healthcare provider licensed to practice medicine in this
state. Each such action shall be heard by said tribunal within fifteen (15) days after the defendant’s
answer has been filed.
(b) The attorney and healthcare provider shall be appointed by the presiding justice. The
healthcare provider shall, where feasible, be selected from the same or a substantially similar
specialty as the defendant healthcare provider, as selected by the superior court justice in a manner
the justice determines fair and equitable. Where there are codefendants representing more than one

field of health care, the superior court justice shall determine in the justice's discretion who shall
represent the healthcare field on the tribunal.
10-19.1-3. Tribunal hearing and standard of review.
(a) The tribunal shall conduct a hearing at which the plaintiff shall present an offer of proof.
(b) The offer of proof shall consist of such evidence as would be admissible at trial.
(c) The tribunal shall determine whether the evidence presented, if properly substantiated,
is sufficient to raise a legitimate question of liability appropriate for judicial inquiry or whether the
plaintiff’s case is merely an unfortunate medical result.
(d) The tribunal shall not resolve disputed issues of fact, assess credibility, or determine
damages.
10-19.1-4. Tribunal finding for the plaintiff.
If the tribunal determines that the plaintiff’s offer of proof is sufficient, the action shall
proceed in the superior court in the normal course without further restriction.
10-19.1-5. Tribunal finding for the defendant; Bond requirement.
(a) If the tribunal determines that the plaintiff’s offer of proof is insufficient, the plaintiff
may proceed with the action only upon filing a bond in the amount of six thousand dollars ($6,000),
conditioned upon payment of the defendant’s taxable costs if the plaintiff does not prevail.
(b) Upon a showing that the plaintiff is indigent or that the bond requirement would create
an undue hardship, the court may reduce the amount of the bond but may not eliminate the
requirement.
(c) Failure to post the required bond within thirty (30) days of the tribunal’s finding shall
result in dismissal of the action without prejudice.
10-19.1-6. Effect of tribunal proceedings.
The finding of the tribunal shall be admissible as evidence at trial.
10-19.1-7. Costs and compensation.
(a) Tribunal members other than the presiding justice shall be compensated at a rate
established by the chief justice of the supreme court.
(b) Costs associated with tribunal proceedings shall be taxed as costs in the action at the
discretion of the court.
10-19.1-8. Rules.
The chief justice of the supreme court shall promulgate rules and fee schedules necessary
to implement the provisions of this chapter.
LC003601 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall apply to all medical
malpractice actions filed on or after January 1, 2027.
========
LC003601
========
LC003601 - Page 3 of 4